New York, session 2025-2026, A475.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3602 of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 14-a to read as follows: 3 14-a. Districts shall be reimbursed for any actual expenses incurred 4 relating to any study that is required by the department for purposes of 5 approving a reorganization. For purposes of this subdivision the term 6 "reorganization" shall mean any merger, consolidation, or annexation 7 eligible for aid under subdivision fourteen of this section. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 9 if upon such effective date, an appropriation to the education depart- 10 ment shall not have been made for reimbursement of school districts and 11 boards of cooperative educational services for the purposes of imple- 12 menting the provisions of subdivision 14-a of section 3602 of the educa- 13 tion law, as added by section one of this act, then this act shall take 14 effect on the forty-fifth day after such an appropriation is made, and 15 provided, further, that the division of the budget shall notify the 16 legislative bill drifting commission upon enactment whether such an 17 appropriation has been made, and if such appropriation shall not have 18 been made on or before such date, the division of the budget shall noti- 19 fy the legislative bill drafting commission upon the date such an appro- 20 priation shall have been made, in order that the commission may maintain 21 an accurate and timely effective data base of the official text of the 22 laws of the state of New York in furtherance of effectuating the 23 provisions of section 44 of the legislative law and section 70-b of the 24 public officers law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01379-01-5